test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_A_NoExtra_mashkimod_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     mashkimod: mashkimod
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1mashkimod: nimashkimod
     +Px2mashkimod: gimashkimod
     +Px3mashkimod: omashkimod
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mashkimod+Dim: mashkimodens
     mashkimod+Con: mashkimodenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     mashkimod+Pos: mashkimodim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mashkimod+Pej: mashkimodish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     mashkimod+Pos1Pl: mashkimodinaan
     mashkimod+PosPl: mashkimodiwaa
     mashkimod+PosObv: mashkimodini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mashkimod+Pret: mashkimodiban
     mashkimod+VocPl: mashkimod***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mashkimod+Obv: mashkimodan
     mashkimod+Pl: mashkimodag
     mashkimod+Loc: mashkimoding
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim: nimashkimodens
     +Px1mashkimod+Con: nimashkimodenh
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim: gimashkimodens
     +Px2mashkimod+Con: gimashkimodenh
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim: omashkimodens
     +Px3mashkimod+Con: omashkimodenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos: nimashkimodim
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos: gimashkimodim
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos: omashkimodim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej: nimashkimodish
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej: gimashkimodish
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej: omashkimodish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos1Pl: nimashkimodinaan
     +Px1mashkimod+PosPl: nimashkimodiwaa
     +Px1mashkimod+PosObv: nimashkimodini
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos1Pl: gimashkimodinaan
     +Px2mashkimod+PosPl: gimashkimodiwaa
     +Px2mashkimod+PosObv: gimashkimodini
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos1Pl: omashkimodinaan
     +Px3mashkimod+PosPl: omashkimodiwaa
     +Px3mashkimod+PosObv: omashkimodini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1mashkimod+Pret: nimashkimodiban
     +Px1mashkimod+VocPl: nimashkimod***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Pret: gimashkimodiban
     +Px2mashkimod+VocPl: gimashkimod***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Pret: omashkimodiban
     +Px3mashkimod+VocPl: omashkimod***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1mashkimod+Obv: nimashkimodan
     +Px1mashkimod+Pl: nimashkimodag
     +Px1mashkimod+Loc: nimashkimoding
     +Px2mashkimod+Obv: gimashkimodan
     +Px2mashkimod+Pl: gimashkimodag
     +Px2mashkimod+Loc: gimashkimoding
     +Px3mashkimod+Obv: omashkimodan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pl: omashkimodag
     +Px3mashkimod+Loc: omashkimoding
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos: mashkimodensim
     mashkimod+Con+Pos: mashkimodenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mashkimod+Dim+Pej: mashkimodensish
     mashkimod+Con+Pej: mashkimodenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     mashkimod+Dim+Pos1Pl: mashkimodensinaan
     mashkimod+Dim+PosPl: mashkimodensiwaa
     mashkimod+Dim+PosObv: mashkimodensini
     mashkimod+Con+Pos1Pl: mashkimodenhinaan
     mashkimod+Con+PosPl: mashkimodenhiwaa
     mashkimod+Con+PosObv: mashkimodenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     mashkimod+Dim+Pret: mashkimodensiban
     mashkimod+Dim+VocPl: mashkimodens***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+Con+Pret: mashkimodenhiban
     mashkimod+Con+VocPl: mashkimodenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     mashkimod+Dim+Obv: mashkimodensan
     mashkimod+Dim+Pl: mashkimodensag
     mashkimod+Dim+Loc: mashkimodensing
     mashkimod+Con+Obv: mashkimodenhan
     mashkimod+Con+Pl: mashkimodenhag
     mashkimod+Con+Loc: mashkimodenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     mashkimod+Pos+Pej: mashkimodimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl: mashkimodiminaan
     mashkimod+Pos+PosPl: mashkimodimiwaa
     mashkimod+Pos+PosObv: mashkimodimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     mashkimod+Pos+Pret: mashkimodimiban
     mashkimod+Pos+VocPl: mashkimodim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     mashkimod+Pos+Obv: mashkimodiman
     mashkimod+Pos+Pl: mashkimodimag
     mashkimod+Pos+Loc: mashkimodiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl: mashkimodishinaan
     mashkimod+Pej+PosPl: mashkimodishiwaa
     mashkimod+Pej+PosObv: mashkimodishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     mashkimod+Pej+Pret: mashkimodishiban
     mashkimod+Pej+VocPl: mashkimodish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     mashkimod+Pej+Obv: mashkimodishan
     mashkimod+Pej+Pl: mashkimodishag
     mashkimod+Pej+Loc: mashkimodishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     mashkimod+Pos1Pl+Pret: mashkimodinaaniban
     mashkimod+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mashkimodinaan***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+PosPl+Pret: mashkimodiwaaiban
     mashkimod+PosPl+VocPl: mashkimodiwaa***idig, idog***
     mashkimod+PosObv+Pret: mashkimodiniiban
     mashkimod+PosObv+VocPl: mashkimodini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     mashkimod+Pos1Pl+Obv: mashkimodinaanan
     mashkimod+Pos1Pl+Pl: mashkimodinaanag
     mashkimod+Pos1Pl+Loc: mashkimodinaaning
     mashkimod+PosPl+Obv: mashkimodiwaaan
     mashkimod+PosPl+Pl: mashkimodiwaaag
     mashkimod+PosPl+Loc: mashkimodiwaaing
     mashkimod+PosObv+Obv: mashkimodinian
     mashkimod+PosObv+Pl: mashkimodiniag
     mashkimod+PosObv+Loc: mashkimodiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     mashkimod+Pret+Obv: mashkimodibanan
     mashkimod+Pret+Pl: mashkimodibanag
     mashkimod+Pret+Loc: mashkimodibaning
     mashkimod+VocPl+Obv: mashkimod***idig, idog***an
     mashkimod+VocPl+Pl: mashkimod***idig, idog***ag
     mashkimod+VocPl+Loc: mashkimod***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos: nimashkimodensim
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos: nimashkimodenhim
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos: gimashkimodensim
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos: gimashkimodenhim
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos: omashkimodensim
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos: omashkimodenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pej: nimashkimodensish
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pej: nimashkimodenhish
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pej: gimashkimodensish
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pej: gimashkimodenhish
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pej: omashkimodensish
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pej: omashkimodenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pos1Pl: nimashkimodensinaan
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+PosPl: nimashkimodensiwaa
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+PosObv: nimashkimodensini
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pos1Pl: nimashkimodenhinaan
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+PosPl: nimashkimodenhiwaa
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+PosObv: nimashkimodenhini
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pos1Pl: gimashkimodensinaan
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+PosPl: gimashkimodensiwaa
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+PosObv: gimashkimodensini
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pos1Pl: gimashkimodenhinaan
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+PosPl: gimashkimodenhiwaa
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+PosObv: gimashkimodenhini
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pos1Pl: omashkimodensinaan
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+PosPl: omashkimodensiwaa
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+PosObv: omashkimodensini
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pos1Pl: omashkimodenhinaan
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+PosPl: omashkimodenhiwaa
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+PosObv: omashkimodenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pret: nimashkimodensiban
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+VocPl: nimashkimodens***idig, idog***
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pret: nimashkimodenhiban
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+VocPl: nimashkimodenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pret: gimashkimodensiban
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+VocPl: gimashkimodens***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pret: gimashkimodenhiban
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+VocPl: gimashkimodenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pret: omashkimodensiban
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+VocPl: omashkimodens***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pret: omashkimodenhiban
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+VocPl: omashkimodenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Obv: nimashkimodensan
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Pl: nimashkimodensag
     +Px1mashkimod+Dim+Loc: nimashkimodensing
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Obv: nimashkimodenhan
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Pl: nimashkimodenhag
     +Px1mashkimod+Con+Loc: nimashkimodenhing
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Obv: gimashkimodensan
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Pl: gimashkimodensag
     +Px2mashkimod+Dim+Loc: gimashkimodensing
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Obv: gimashkimodenhan
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Pl: gimashkimodenhag
     +Px2mashkimod+Con+Loc: gimashkimodenhing
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Obv: omashkimodensan
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Pl: omashkimodensag
     +Px3mashkimod+Dim+Loc: omashkimodensing
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Obv: omashkimodenhan
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Pl: omashkimodenhag
     +Px3mashkimod+Con+Loc: omashkimodenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+Pej: nimashkimodimish
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Pej: gimashkimodimish
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Pej: omashkimodimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl: nimashkimodiminaan
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+PosPl: nimashkimodimiwaa
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+PosObv: nimashkimodimini
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl: gimashkimodiminaan
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosPl: gimashkimodimiwaa
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+PosObv: gimashkimodimini
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Pos1Pl: omashkimodiminaan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosPl: omashkimodimiwaa
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+PosObv: omashkimodimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+Pret: nimashkimodimiban
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+VocPl: nimashkimodim***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Pret: gimashkimodimiban
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+VocPl: gimashkimodim***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Pret: omashkimodimiban
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+VocPl: omashkimodim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+Obv: nimashkimodiman
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+Pl: nimashkimodimag
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos+Loc: nimashkimodiming
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Obv: gimashkimodiman
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Pl: gimashkimodimag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pos+Loc: gimashkimodiming
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Obv: omashkimodiman
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Pl: omashkimodimag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pos+Loc: omashkimodiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl: nimashkimodishinaan
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosPl: nimashkimodishiwaa
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+PosObv: nimashkimodishini
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl: gimashkimodishinaan
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosPl: gimashkimodishiwaa
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+PosObv: gimashkimodishini
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Pos1Pl: omashkimodishinaan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosPl: omashkimodishiwaa
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+PosObv: omashkimodishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Pret: nimashkimodishiban
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+VocPl: nimashkimodish***idig, idog***
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Pret: gimashkimodishiban
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+VocPl: gimashkimodish***idig, idog***
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Pret: omashkimodishiban
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+VocPl: omashkimodish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Obv: nimashkimodishan
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Pl: nimashkimodishag
     +Px1mashkimod+Pej+Loc: nimashkimodishing
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Obv: gimashkimodishan
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Pl: gimashkimodishag
     +Px2mashkimod+Pej+Loc: gimashkimodishing
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Obv: omashkimodishan
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Pl: omashkimodishag
     +Px3mashkimod+Pej+Loc: omashkimodishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimashkimodinaaniban
     +Px1mashkimod+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimashkimodinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1mashkimod+PosPl+Pret: nimashkimodiwaaiban
